Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska74-1310
Department, defined.

For purposes of sections 74-1310 to 74-1322, unless the context otherwise requires, department shall mean the Department of Transportation.

Laws 1979, LB 42, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 25;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 251.